Missouri, session 2026, HB2006.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period
beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
PART 1
Section 6.000. Each appropriation in this act shall consist of the item or
items in each section of Part 1 of this act, for the amount and
purpose and from the fund designated in each section of Part 1,
as well as all additional clarifications of purpose in Part 2 of this

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 2
act that make reference by section to said item or items in Part 1.
Any clarification of purpose in Part 2 shall state the section or
sections in Part 1 to which it attaches and shall, together with the
language of said section(s) in Part 1, form the complete statement
of purpose of the appropriation. As such, the provisions of Part
2 of this act shall not be severed from Part 1, and if any
clarification of purpose in Part 2 is for any reason held to be
invalid, such decision shall invalidate all of the appropriations in
this act of which said clarification of purpose is a part. An
appropriation may be comprised in whole or in part of a one-time
amount, and such one-time amount shall be construed to be a
component part of, and not in addition to, the stated appropriation
amount. Any amount of an appropriation identified as “one-
time” in this act shall not be considered an addition to any
ongoing core appropriation(s) in future fiscal periods beyond
June 30, 2027. Any amount identified as one-time may, however,
be requested in any future fiscal period as a new decision item.
Section 6.005. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Office of the Director, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between funds and no flexibility is allowed
between personal services and expense and equipment
Personal Service ................................................................................................$361,945
Expense and Equipment (including $2,884,912 one-time) ...................... 6,044,897
From Department of Agriculture Federal Fund (1133) ...............................................6,406,842
Personal Service ..................................................................................................863,698
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 122,956
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ......................................................................986,654
Personal Service ....................................................................................................34,458
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,721
From Animal Care Reserve Fund (1295)..........................................................................37,179
Personal Service ....................................................................................................31,658
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,727
From Animal Health Laboratory Fee Fund (1292) ...........................................................34,385
Personal Service ....................................................................................................98,946

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 3
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,964
From Grain Inspection Fee Fund (1647) ........................................................................104,910
Personal Service ....................................................................................................28,024
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,714
From Missouri Land Survey Fund (1668) ........................................................................29,738
Personal Service ....................................................................................................51,997
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,451
From Missouri Wine and Grape Fund (1787) ...................................................................55,448
Personal Service ..................................................................................................111,575
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 7,195
From Petroleum Inspection Fund (1662) ........................................................................118,770
Personal Service ..................................................................................................118,732
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 7,380
From State Fair Fee Fund (1410) ....................................................................................126,112
For refunds of erroneous receipts due to errors in application for licenses,
registrations, permits, certificates, subscriptions, or other fees
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ........................................................................13,500
For the monitoring and regulation of foreign ownership of agricultural
land
Personal Service ..................................................................................................170,664
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 19,290
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................189,954
For costs associated with the relocation of Clarendon Road
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................1,000,000
For the planning, design, and construction of Clarendon Road
From OA I-70 Project Fund (133) ....................................................................... 20,000,000
Total (Not to exceed 24.10 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$29,103,492
Section 6.010. To the Department of Agriculture
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Veterinary Student Loan Payment Fund
From Lottery Proceeds Fund (1291) .............................................................................$360,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 4
Section 6.015. To the Department of Agriculture
For large animal veterinary student loans in accordance with the
provisions of Sections 340.375 to 340.396, RSMo
From Veterinary Student Loan Payment Fund (1803) .................................................$420,000
Section 6.016. To the Department of Agriculture
For Agriculture Education
For an organization founded in 2016 that partners with high school
students, collegiate students, and adult educators and is located
in a city with more than seventeen thousand five hundred but
fewer than seventeen thousand six hundred inhabitants and that
is the county seat of a county with more than twenty-five
thousand but fewer than twenty-five thousand five hundred
inhabitants for the expansion of elementary agricultural literacy
to strengthen rural communities which focuses on enriching lives
one classroom at a time
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$250,000
For a non-profit organization founded in 1929 to secure strategic
partnerships and financial resources to enhance, strengthen, and
support the educational and leadership opportunities that promote
premier leadership, personal growth and career success for
Missourians in Agricultural Education
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 800,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,050,000
Section 6.020. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Agriculture Business Development Division, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
6.150
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,415,449
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 24,720
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,440,169
For the Agriculture Business Development Division, provided twenty-
five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between funds and no
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment
Personal Service ....................................................................................................79,442

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 5
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 423,886
From Department of Agriculture Federal Fund (1133) ..................................................503,328
Personal Service ......................................................................................................5,167
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 76,735
From Agriculture Business Development Fund (1683) ....................................................81,902
Personal Service ....................................................................................................18,288
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 275,638
From AgriMissouri Fund (1897) ....................................................................................293,926
Personal Service ..................................................................................................321,006
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 430,963
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ......................................................................751,969
For the Governor’s Conference on Agriculture
From Agriculture Business Development Fund (1683) ....................................................75,000
For urban and non-traditional agriculture
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ........................................................................25,000
For competitive grants to innovative projects that promote agriculture in
urban/suburban communities
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ........................................................................50,000
For supporting farmers’ markets and other economic development
initiatives that work to reduce food insecurity in areas which have
been designated an urbanized area by the United States Census
Bureau
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................250,000
For supporting farmers’ markets and other economic development
initiatives that work to reduce food insecurity in areas which have
been designated a rural area by the United States Census Bureau
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................100,000
For applying for a grant under the United States Department of
Agriculture's Senior farmers' market nutrition program, and
applying for a grant and submitting a state plan under that United
States department's Women, Infants and Children farmers'

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 6
market nutrition program, for the purpose of providing low-
income seniors and pregnant and postpartum women, infants, and
children under five years of age who are found to be at nutritional
risk with vouchers or other approved and acceptable methods of
payment including, but not limited to, electronic cards that may
be used to purchase eligible foods at farmers' markets
Personal Service ....................................................................................................51,025
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 59,402
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................110,427
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Agriculture Federal Fund (1133) ..................................................235,070
For the Abattoir Program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 1
Total (Not to exceed 29.51 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,916,792
Section 6.025. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Agriculture Business Development Division
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................$1,755
For the Missouri Grown Program
Personal Service ....................................................................................................47,047
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 218,810
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ........................................................... 265,857
Total (Not to exceed 0.97 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$267,612
Section 6.030. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Agriculture Business Development Division
For the Wine and Grape Program, provided five percent (5%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 6.150
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$11,397
Personal Service ..................................................................................................434,426
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,699,888
From Missouri Wine and Grape Fund (1787) ...................................................... 3,134,314

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 7
Total (Not to exceed 5.00 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$3,145,711
Section 6.035. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Agriculture Business Development Division
For the Agriculture and Small Business Development Authority,
provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between funds and no flexibility is allowed between personal
service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ................................................................................................$153,232
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 9,264
From Single-Purpose Animal Facilities Loan Program Fund (1408) .............................162,496
Personal Service ....................................................................................................14,536
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,000
From Livestock Feed and Crop Input Loan Program Fund (1978) ..................................16,536
Expense and Equipment
From Agricultural Product Utilization Grant Fund (1413) .................................. 100
Total (Not to exceed 3.20 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$179,132
Section 6.040. To the Department of Agriculture
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Single-
Purpose Animal Facilities Loan Guarantee Fund, provided one
hundred percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between Sections
6.040, 6.050, and 6.060, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 6.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................$5,000
Section 6.045. To the Department of Agriculture
For loan guarantees as provided in Sections 348.190 and 348.200, RSMo
From Single-Purpose Animal Facilities Loan Guarantee Fund (1409) ........................$201,046
Section 6.050. To the Department of Agriculture
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Agricultural Product Utilization and Business Development Loan
Guarantee Fund, provided one hundred percent (100%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 6.040, 6.050, and 6.060,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 6.150

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 8
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$15,000
Section 6.055. To the Department of Agriculture
For loan guarantees as provided in Sections 348.403, 348.408, and
348.409, RSMo
From Agricultural Product Utilization and Business Development Loan
Guarantee Fund (1411) .....................................................................................$624,501
Section 6.060. To the Department of Agriculture
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Livestock Feed and Crop Input Loan Guarantee Fund, provided
one hundred percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 6.040, 6.050, and 6.060, and further provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
6.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................$5,000
Section 6.065. To the Department of Agriculture
For loan guarantees for loans administered by the Missouri Agricultural
and Small Business Development Authority for the purpose of
financing the purchase of livestock feed used to produce livestock
and input used to produce crops for the feeding of livestock,
provided the appropriation may not exceed $2,000,000
From Livestock Feed and Crop Input Loan Guarantee Fund (1914) ..............................$50,000
Section 6.070. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Agriculture Business Development Division
For the Agriculture Development Program
Personal Service ................................................................................................$105,647
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 41,744
From Agriculture Development Fund (1904) .................................................................147,391
For all monies in the Agriculture Development Fund for investments,
reinvestments, and for emergency agricultural relief and
rehabilitation as provided by law
From Agriculture Development Fund (1904) ...................................................... 100,000
Total (Not to exceed 1.60 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$247,391
Section 6.075. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Missouri Dairy Industry Revitalization Act

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 9
From Missouri Dairy Industry Revitalization Fund (1414) ............................................$25,000
Section 6.080. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Division of Animal Health, provided five percent (5%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 6.150
Personal Service .............................................................................................$4,435,421
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 899,984
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,335,405
For the Division of Animal Health, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between funds, and further provided five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,536,293
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 996,239
From Department of Agriculture Federal Fund (1133) ...............................................2,532,532
Personal Service ..................................................................................................137,152
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,367,067
From Animal Health Laboratory Fee Fund (1292) ......................................................1,504,219
Personal Service ..................................................................................................611,219
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 185,976
From Animal Care Reserve Fund (1295)........................................................................797,195
Personal Service
From Livestock Brands Fund (1299) .....................................................................................142
Expense and Equipment
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ..........................................................................2,462
Expense and Equipment
From Puppy Protection Trust Fund (1985) .........................................................................5,000
Expense and Equipment
From Large Carnivore Fund (1988) ..................................................................................10,000
To support local efforts to spay and neuter cats and dogs

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 10
From Missouri Pet Spay/Neuter Fund (1747) ...................................................................50,000
To support the Livestock Brands Program
From Livestock Brands Fund (1299) ................................................................................30,698
For expenses incurred in regulating Missouri livestock markets
From Livestock Sales and Markets Fees Fund (1581)......................................................30,690
For processing livestock market bankruptcy claims
From Agriculture Bond Trustee Fund (1756) .................................................................129,000
For contributions, gifts, and grants in support of relief efforts to reduce
the suffering of abandoned animals
From State Institutions Gift Trust Fund (1925) ..................................................................5,000
For black vulture mitigation
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 660,000
Total (Not to exceed 96.47 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$11,092,343
Section 6.085. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Division of Animal Health
For indemnity payments and for indemnifying producers and owners of
livestock and poultry for preventing the spread of disease during
emergencies declared by the State Veterinarian, subject to the
approval by the Department of Agriculture, of a state match rate
up to fifty percent (50%), provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 6.150
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................$5,000
Section 6.090. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Division of Grain Inspection and Warehousing, provided five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 6.150
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,016,583
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 68,826
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,085,409
For the Division of Grain Inspection and Warehousing, provided twenty-
five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between funds, and five

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 11
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service ....................................................................................................46,110
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 36,211
From Department of Agriculture Federal Fund (1133) ....................................................82,321
Expense and Equipment
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ......................................................................105,000
Personal Service ....................................................................................................86,022
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 31,651
From Commodity Council Merchandising Fund (1406) ................................................117,673
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,120,870
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 708,709
From Grain Inspection Fee Fund (1647) ............................................................. 3,829,579
Total (Not to exceed 93.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$5,219,982
Section 6.095. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Division of Grain Inspection and Warehousing
For the Missouri Aquaculture Council
From Aquaculture Marketing Development Fund (1573) ................................................$7,000
For research, promotion, and market development of apples
From Apple Merchandising Fund (1615) ...........................................................................7,000
For the Missouri Wine Marketing and Research Council
From Missouri Wine Marketing and Research Development Fund
(1855) ....................................................................................................... 60,000
Total ................................................................................................................................$74,000
Section 6.100. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Division of Plant Industries, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between funds in this section and five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,364,238
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,280,789
From Department of Agriculture Federal Fund (1133) ...............................................2,645,027

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 12
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,986,948
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,283,768
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ...................................................................4,270,716
For the Invasive Pest Control Program, provided fifty percent (50%)
flexibility is allowed between funds in this section and five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service ....................................................................................................40,321
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 71,388
From Department of Agriculture Federal Fund (1133) ..................................................111,709
Personal Service ..................................................................................................174,593
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 58,000
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ......................................................................232,593
For the Boll Weevil Eradication Program, provided no flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ....................................................................................................54,040
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 24,657
From Boll Weevil Suppression and Eradication Fund (1823) ............................. 78,697
Total (Not to exceed 76.81 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$7,338,742
Section 6.105. To the Department of Agriculture
To the Missouri Fertilizer Control Board, as defined in 266.336
RSMo, for planning and establishing nutrient management
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$250,000
Section 6.110. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Division of Weights, Measures and Consumer Protection,
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 6.150
Personal Service ................................................................................................$843,776
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 436,927
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,280,703
For the Division of Weights, Measures and Consumer Protection,
provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 13
between funds, and five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ....................................................................................................51,091
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 50,000
From Department of Agriculture Federal Fund (1133) ..................................................101,091
Personal Service ..................................................................................................653,084
Expense and Equipment (including $365,000 one-time) ......................... 645,339
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ...................................................................1,298,423
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,173,994
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,169,851
From Petroleum Inspection Fund (1662) ............................................................. 3,343,845
Total (Not to exceed 69.11 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,024,062
Section 6.115. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Missouri Land Survey Program, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 6.150
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$58,653
For the Missouri Land Survey Program, provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between funds, and five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment
Personal Service ..................................................................................................921,320
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 246,832
From Missouri Land Survey Fund (1668) ...................................................................1,168,152
Personal Service ..................................................................................................230,605
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 80,000
From Department of Agriculture Land Survey Revolving Services Fund
(1426) ..................................................................................................................310,605
For surveying corners and for records restorations, provided fifty percent
(50%) flexibility is allowed between funds
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Agriculture Federal Fund (1133) ....................................................60,000
From Missouri Land Survey Fund (1668) ........................................................... 90,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 14
Total (Not to exceed 14.68 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,687,410
Section 6.120. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Missouri State Fair, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between funds, and five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 6.150
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$764,189
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,589,608
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,175,837
From State Fair Fee Fund (1410) .................................................................................5,765,445
Personal Service
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ........................................................... 666,941
Total (Not to exceed 63.38 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$7,196,575
Section 6.125. To the Department of Agriculture
For cash to start the Missouri State Fair
Expense and Equipment
From State Fair Fee Fund (1410) ....................................................................................$74,250
From State Fair Trust Fund (1951) ...................................................................... 9,900
Total ................................................................................................................................$84,150
Section 6.130. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Missouri State Fair
For equipment replacement
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$225,000
From State Fair Fee Fund (1410) ......................................................................... 165,962
Total ..............................................................................................................................$390,962
Section 6.135. To the Department of Agriculture
For the State Milk Board, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 6.150

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 15
Personal Service ................................................................................................$141,160
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 682
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................141,842
For the State Milk Board, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ..................................................................................................827,152
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 765,175
From State Milk Inspection Fee Fund (1645) ...................................................... 1,592,327
Total (Not to exceed 9.93 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$1,734,169
Section 6.150. To the Department of Agriculture
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Legal Expense Fund for the payment of claims, premiums, and
expenses as provided by Section 105.711 through 105.726,
RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Section 6.200. To the Department of Natural Resources
For department operations, administration, and support, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
6.400
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,163,892
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 57,083
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,220,975
For department operations, administration, and support, provided five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between funds and no
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment
Personal Service ..................................................................................................610,625
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 106,434
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .......................................717,059
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,552,194
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 507,874
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) ....................................................................4,060,068
Personal Service
From Department of Natural Resources Revolving Services Fund (1425) ......................54,688

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 16
For implementation on the citizen engagement platform of a permitting
application providing
transparency and two-way communication for efficient and
timely permitting, provided the department shall procure services
in compliance with Chapter 34 RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,000,000
For Contractual Audits
From State Parks Earnings Fund (1415) (including $313 one-time) ................................93,154
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) (including $156 one-time) ........................86,709
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) (including $892 one-time) ........... 202,068
Total (Not to exceed 76.71 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$10,434,721
Section 6.225. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of Environmental Quality
For Administrative Expenses, provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility
between all federal and other funds is allowed between
subsections indicated in Section 6.225, and fifty percent (50%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment from General Revenue between and within the
subsections indicated in Section 6.225, and further provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to section
6.400
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$152,506
Personal Service ..................................................................................................340,794
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 50,000
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .......................................390,794
Personal Service ..................................................................................................952,510
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 112,039
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) ....................................................................1,064,549
For the Water Protection Program
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,584,104
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,435,768
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,008,699

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 17
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ....................................4,444,467
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,199,241
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 656,779
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ...........................................................................................3,856,020
Personal Service ..................................................................................................823,524
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 749,441
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) ......................................................................1,572,965
For Air Pollution Control
Personal Service ..................................................................................................978,279
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 112,771
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,091,050
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,331,241
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 71,939
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ....................................1,403,180
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,071,198
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 88,877
From Missouri Air Emission Reduction Fund (1267) .................................................1,160,075
Personal Service ..................................................................................................140,202
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 17,855
From Volkswagen Environmental Mitigation Trust Proceeds Fund
(1268) ..................................................................................................................158,057
Personal Service ..................................................................................................243,321
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 21,728
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Asbestos Fee
Subaccount (1584) ..............................................................................................265,049
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,846,544
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 116,287
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1594) ...........................................................................................2,962,831
Personal Service ..................................................................................................170,989
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 63,074

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 18
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Anhydrous Ammonia Risk
Management Plan Subaccount (1554) ................................................................234,063
For Environmental Remediation
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................507,003
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,051,083
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 261,459
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ....................................3,312,542
Personal Service ..................................................................................................334,856
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 40,114
From Natural Resources Protection Fund (1555) ...........................................................374,970
Personal Service ..................................................................................................131,985
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 41,166
From Underground Storage Tank Regulation Program Fund (1586) .............................173,151
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,246,179
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 157,985
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ...........................................................................1,404,164
Personal Service
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) ...................................................................17,475
Personal Service ....................................................................................................37,053
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 44,882
From Environmental Radiation Monitoring Fund (1656) ................................................81,935
For the Waste Management Program
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................219,683
Personal Service ..................................................................................................907,578
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 59,203
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .......................................966,781
Personal Service ..................................................................................................348,693
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 27,002
From Coal Combustion Residuals Subaccount (1551) ...................................................375,695

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 19
Personal Service ..................................................................................................297,171
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 27,001
From Solid Waste Management Fund – Scrap Tire Subaccount (1569) ........................324,172
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,068,339
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 244,193
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) ..............................................................2,312,532
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,040,770
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 64,001
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ...........................................................................1,104,771
For Regional Offices
Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,068,444
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 128,387
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,196,831
100 Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,365,529
101 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 250,941
102 From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ....................................2,616,470
103 Personal Service ....................................................................................................81,832
104 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 17,000
105 From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Asbestos Fee
106 Subaccount (1584) ................................................................................................98,832
107 Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,642,024
108 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 149,298
109 From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit Fee
110 Subaccount (1568) ...........................................................................................1,791,322
111 Personal Service ..................................................................................................308,895
112 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 25,248
113 From Solid Waste Management Fund – Scrap Tire Subaccount (1569) ........................334,143
114 Personal Service ..................................................................................................504,736
115 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 46,815
116 From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) .................................................................551,551
117 Personal Service ..................................................................................................423,736
118 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 76,743

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 20
119 From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Permit Fee
120 Subaccount (1594) ..............................................................................................500,479
121 Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,140,238
122 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 195,789
123 From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) ......................................................................1,336,027
124 Personal Service ..................................................................................................328,357
125 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 26,211
126 From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ..............................................................................354,568
127 Personal Service
128 From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) .......................................................................389,680
129 Personal Service ..................................................................................................201,134
130 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 17,133
131 From Missouri Air Emission Reduction Fund (1267) ....................................................218,267
132 For the Environmental Services Program
133 Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,070,173
134 Expense and Equipment (including $750,000 one-time) ........................ 1,016,314
135 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,086,487
136 Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,684,280
137 Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 1,466,169
138 From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ....................................3,150,449
139 Personal Service ..................................................................................................418,291
140 Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 27,000
141 From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit Fee
142 Subaccount (1568) ..............................................................................................445,291
143 Personal Service ..................................................................................................697,425
144 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 398,843
145 From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Permit Fee
146 Subaccount (1594) ...........................................................................................1,096,268
147 Personal Service ....................................................................................................95,902
148 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 30,632
149 From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ..............................................................................126,534
150 Personal Service ..................................................................................................867,377

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 21
151 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 8,631
152 From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) .........................................................................876,008
153 Personal Service ......................................................................................................9,494
154 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 8,869
155 From Natural Resources Protection Fund (1555) .............................................................18,363
156 Personal Service ....................................................................................................73,265
157 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 8,108
158 From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) ...................................................................81,373
159 Personal Service ......................................................................................................4,636
160 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,420
161 From Environmental Radiation Monitoring Fund (1656) ..................................................7,056
162 For the Financial Assistance Center
163 Personal Service ..................................................................................................283,393
164 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 7,938
165 From General Revenue Fund (1101) .............................................................................291,331
166 Personal Service ..................................................................................................646,608
167 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 91,878
168 From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .......................................738,486
169 Personal Service ..................................................................................................555,418
170 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 114,220
171 From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit Fee
172 Subaccount (1568) ..............................................................................................669,638
173 Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,102,516
174 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 90,956
175 From Water and Wastewater Loan Fund (1649) ................................................. 1,193,472
176 Total (Not to exceed 741.70 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$55,683,510
Section 6.230. To the Department of Natural Resources
For environmental education and studies, demonstration projects, and
technical assistance grants, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility
is allowed between funds
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .....................................$350,000
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ................................................................................... 350,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 22
Total ..............................................................................................................................$700,000
Section 6.235. To the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure grants and loans, provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between other funds
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$9,251,461
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ..................................17,512,000
From Water and Wastewater Loan Fund (1649) .....................................................151,419,446
From Water and Wastewater Loan Revolving Fund (1602) ....................................836,575,262
From Water Pollution Control (37E) Fund (1330) ...........................................................20,000
From Water Pollution Control (37G) Fund (1329) ...........................................................10,000
From Stormwater Control (37H) Fund (1302) ..................................................................10,000
From Storm Water Loan Revolving Fund (1754) ........................................................1,500,000
From Rural Water and Sewer Loan Revolving Fund (1755) .......................................1,500,000
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ................................................................................... 3,000,000
Total ....................................................................................................................$1,020,798,169
Section 6.240. To the Department of Natural Resources
For grants and contracts to study or reduce water pollution, improve
ground water and/or surface water quality, provided $9,000,000
be used solely to encumber funds for future fiscal year
expenditures, and provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between funds
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ................................$17,497,460
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ...........................................................................................2,800,000
For drinking water sampling, analysis, and public drinking water quality
and treatment studies
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) .............................................................. 599,852
Total .........................................................................................................................$20,897,312
Section 6.245. To the Department of Natural Resources
For closure of concentrated animal feeding operations
From Concentrated Animal Feeding Operation Indemnity Fund (1834) .......................$60,000
Section 6.250. To the Department of Natural Resources

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 23
For grants and contracts for air pollution control activities, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between funds
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ..................................$2,686,494
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1594) ..............................................................................................100,000
For grants and contracts for air pollution control activities in accordance
with the department’s beneficiary mitigation plan dated August
6, 2018
From Volkswagen Environmental Mitigation Trust Proceeds Fund
(1268) ....................................................................................................... 5,000,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$7,786,494
Section 6.255. To the Department of Natural Resources
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Hazardous Waste Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $2,142,103 one-time) ....................$2,802,509
Section 6.260. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the cleanup of hazardous waste or substances
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ..................................$1,350,000
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ...........................................................................5,665,613
From Radioactive Waste Investigation Fund (1560) ........................................... 150,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$7,165,613
Section 6.265. To the Department of Natural Resources
For implementation provisions of the Solid Waste Management Law in
accordance with Sections 260.250 through 260.345, RSMo
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) ............................................................$6,998,820
From Solid Waste Management Fund – Scrap Tire Subaccount (1569) .....................2,500,000
For grants to Solid Waste Management Districts for funding community-
based reduce, reuse, and recycle grants
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) ...................................................... 5,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$14,498,820
Section 6.270. To the Department of Natural Resources
For expenditures of forfeited financial assurance instruments to ensure
proper closure and post closure of solid waste landfills, with

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 24
general revenue expenditures not to exceed collections pursuant
to Section 260.228, RSMo
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$23,812
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 428,984
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................452,796
For expenditures of forfeited financial assurance instruments to ensure
proper closure and post closure of solid waste landfills, provided
ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service
and expense and equipment
Personal Service ......................................................................................................1,440
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 423,973
From Post Closure Fund (1198) ........................................................................... 425,413
Total ..............................................................................................................................$878,209
Section 6.275. To the Department of Natural Resources
For environmental emergency response
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ............................................................................$300,000
Section 6.280. To the Department of Natural Resources
For petroleum related activities and environmental emergency response
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,349,023
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 84,680
From Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance Fund (1585) (Not to exceed
21.20 F.T.E.) ..................................................................................................$1,433,703
Section 6.285. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Missouri Geological Survey, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 6.400
Personal Service .............................................................................................$3,936,776
Expense and Equipment (including $283,427 one-time) ......................... 2,583,733
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................6,520,509
For a statewide dam inspector performing inspections of non-agricultural
dams
Personal Service ....................................................................................................81,760
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,421
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................88,181

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 25
For the Missouri Geological Survey, provided fifteen percent (15%)
flexibility is allowed between funds and no flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,233,018
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 501,678
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ....................................2,734,696
Personal Service
From Department of Natural Resources Revolving Services Fund (1425) ......................22,679
Personal Service ..................................................................................................724,617
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 97,577
From Groundwater Protection Fund (1660) ...................................................................822,194
Personal Service ....................................................................................................16,833
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,072
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ................................................................................................21,905
Personal Service ..................................................................................................231,960
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 17,480
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) .................................................................249,440
Personal Service ..................................................................................................185,003
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 31,010
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ..............................................................................216,013
Personal Service ....................................................................................................17,908
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,105
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) .........................................................................22,013
Personal Service ..................................................................................................132,293
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 18,270
From Geologic Resources Fund (1801) ..........................................................................150,563
Personal Service ....................................................................................................41,522
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 13,761
From Metallic Minerals Waste Management Fund (1575) ...............................................55,283
Personal Service ..................................................................................................587,068

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 26
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 202,207
From Mined Land Reclamation Fund (1906) .................................................................789,275
Expense and Equipment
From Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund (1697) ..................................................................13
Personal Service ......................................................................................................9,498
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 7,625
From Oil and Gas Remedial Fund (1699) ........................................................................17,123
Personal Service ..................................................................................................117,134
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 12,006
From Oil and Gas Resources Fund (1543) .....................................................................129,140
Personal Service ....................................................................................................71,855
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,401
From Coal Combustion Residuals Subaccount (1551) .....................................................77,256
Personal Service ....................................................................................................13,023
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,000
From Natural Resources Protection Fund (1555) .............................................................15,023
Personal Service ..................................................................................................114,617
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,902
From Multipurpose Water Resource Program Fund (1815) ...........................................118,519
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,849,576
Expense and Equipment (including $346,771 one-time) ......................... 627,693
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) ...................................................... 2,477,269
Total (Not to exceed 148.58 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$14,527,094
Section 6.290. To the Department of Natural Resources
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Mined
Land Reclamation Fund, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 6.400
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$200,000
Section 6.295. To the Department of Natural Resources
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Multipurpose Water Resource Program Fund, provided three

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 27
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
6.400
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$20,000,000
For the Multipurpose Water Resource Program
From Multipurpose Water Resource Program Fund (1815) ......................................48,187,310
For a drought response plan, water supply availability studies, watershed
feasibility studies and related efforts to protect Missouri’s water
supply interests
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 832,428
Total .........................................................................................................................$69,019,738
Section 6.300. To the Department of Natural Resources
For bond forfeiture funds for the reclamation of mined land
From Mined Land Reclamation Fund (1906) ...............................................................$350,000
For the reclamation of abandoned mined lands
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ....................................9,232,500
For contracts for hydrologic studies to assist small coal operators to meet
permit requirements
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ............................ 1,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$9,583,500
Section 6.305. To the Department of Natural Resources
For expense and equipment in accordance with the provisions of Section
259.190, RSMo
From Oil and Gas Remedial Fund (1699) ....................................................................$150,000
For abandoned oil and gas well inventory and plugging
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ............................ 11,820,949
Total .........................................................................................................................$11,970,949
Section 6.310. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Missouri Geological Survey
For demonstration projects and technical assistance related to soil and
water conservation
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ..................................$1,000,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 28
For a program to improve water quality practices
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .......................................514,772
For grants to local soil and water conservation districts
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) ............................................................19,680,570
For soil and water conservation cost-share grants
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) ............................................................50,000,000
For a conservation monitoring program
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) .................................................................400,000
For grants to colleges and universities for research projects on soil
erosion and conservation
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) ...................................................... 400,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$71,995,342
Section 6.315. To the Department of Natural Resources
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Missouri Water Development Fund, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 6.400
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$600,000
Section 6.320. To the Department of Natural Resources
For interest, operations, and maintenance in accordance with the
Clarence Cannon Water Contract
From Missouri Water Development Fund (1174) ........................................................$600,000
Section 6.325. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of Energy, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 6.400
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$183,960
For the Division of Energy, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between funds and no flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,820,566
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 795,491
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ....................................2,616,057

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 29
Personal Service ..................................................................................................893,951
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 150,368
From Energy Set-Aside Program Fund (1667) ............................................................1,044,319
Personal Service ....................................................................................................71,207
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,215
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) .........................................................................75,422
Personal Service ....................................................................................................97,578
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 20,000
From Energy Futures Fund (1935) ...................................................................... 117,578
Total (Not to exceed 38.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$4,037,336
Section 6.330. To the Department of Natural Resources
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From Utility Revolving Fund (1874) .........................................................................$9,000,000
Section 6.335. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the promotion of energy, renewable energy, and energy efficiency,
provided $13,000,000 be used solely to encumber funds for
future fiscal year expenditures, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between funds and no flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ................................$89,754,073
From Energy Set-Aside Program Fund (1667) ..........................................................17,000,000
From Energy Futures Fund (1935) ..............................................................................6,000,000
For the Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Program
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ............................ 9,948,293
Total .......................................................................................................................$122,702,366
Section 6.340. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Wood Energy Tax Credit Program
For the redemption of authorized tax credits applied for between January
1, 2025, and June 30, 2025, and January 1, 2026, and June 30,
2026, under Sections 135.300 through 135.311, RSMo, provided
three percent (3%) is allowed from this section to Section 6.400
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .………………………………………………$1,000,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 30
Section 6.345. To the Department of Natural Resources
For Missouri State Parks
For State Parks operations, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between federal and other funds and no flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$214,970
Personal Service ..................................................................................................141,409
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 103,658
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .......................................245,067
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,783,847
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,795,637
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) .......................................................................5,579,484
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,106,534
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 68,167
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) ....................................................................1,174,701
Personal Service .............................................................................................30,631,001
Expense and Equipment (including $393,716 one-time) ......................... 11,924,790
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ...........................................................................42,555,791
Personal Service ..................................................................................................242,885
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 798,977
From Rock Island Trail State Park Endowment Fund (1908) .....................................1,041,862
Personal Service ....................................................................................................78,854
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 179,112
From Doctor Edmund A. Babler Memorial State Park Fund (1911) ..............................257,966
Expense and Equipment
From Meramec-Onondaga State Parks Fund (1698) ........................................................65,000
For State Park Operations
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Stimulus – 2021 Fund
(2449) ..................................................................................................................158,622

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 31
For state park support activities and grants and/or loans for recreational
purposes, provided $42,400,000 be used solely to encumber
funds for future fiscal year expenditures
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ..................................65,650,000
For programming that commemorates and interprets the African-
American diaspora through fostering educational and cultural
programs regarding the past, present, and contemporary
contributions of African-Americans who served to shape the city
and state’s history and culture
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..…………………………………………………100,000
Levy District Payments .........................................................................................20,000
Payment in Lieu of Taxes .....................................................................................15,000
Bruce R Watkins Center Expense and Equipment .................................. 100,000
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ................................................................................135,000
Parks Concession Personal Service ......................................................................80,139
Parks Concession Expense and Equipment ........................................................199,350
Gifts to Parks Expense and Equipment ...............................................................750,000
Parks Resale Expense and Equipment .............................................................1,000,000
State Park Grants Expense and Equipment .............................................. 450,000
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ............................................................... 2,479,489
Total (Not to exceed 683.21 F.T.E.) ......................................................................$119,657,952
Section 6.348. To the Department of Natural Resources
For distribution to any county with more than two hundred thousand but
fewer than two hundred thirty thousand inhabitants for the buyout
of land prone to frequent flooding for conversion to a park located
near an unincorporated community located just off Missouri
Route 30 in said county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$2,000,000
Section 6.350. To the Department of Natural Resources
For Historic Preservation Operations, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 6.400
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$57,088

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 32
For Historic Preservation Operations, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between funds and no flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ..................................................................................................480,946
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 50,280
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .......................................531,226
Personal Service ..................................................................................................267,282
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 31,441
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430) ......................................................298,723
Personal Service ..................................................................................................136,140
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,896
From Economic Development Advancement Fund (1783) ............................................147,036
For historic preservation grants and contracts, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between funds
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .......................................600,000
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430) ........................................... 1,339,667
Total (Not to exceed 17.25 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$2,973,740
Section 6.355. To the Department of Natural Resources
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Historic Preservation Revolving Fund, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 6.400
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$946,254
Section 6.360. To the Department of Natural Resources
For expenditures of payments received for damages to the state’s natural
resources, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between funds
Expense and Equipment
From Natural Resources Protection Fund (1555) ......................................................$4,300,000
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ................................................................................... 100,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,400,000
Section 6.365. To the Department of Natural Resources
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Natural Resources Revolving Services Fund (1425) ...............$3,021,898

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 33
Section 6.370. To the Department of Natural Resources
For refunds, provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between funds
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) .........................................$9,445
From Missouri Air Emission Reduction Fund (1267) ......................................................16,038
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ............................................................................84,946
From Department of Natural Resources Revolving Services Fund (1425) ........................1,419
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430) .............................................................165
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) ...........................................................................3,478
From Oil and Gas Resources Fund (1543) ............................................................................100
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Anhydrous Ammonia Risk
Management Plan Subaccount (1554) ....................................................................5,400
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ................................................................................................46,982
From Solid Waste Management Fund – Scrap Tire Subaccount (1569) ............................1,165
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) .....................................................................1,165
From Metallic Minerals Waste Management Fund (1575) ....................................................165
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Asbestos Fee
Subaccount (1584) ..................................................................................................9,930
From Underground Storage Tank Regulation Program Fund (1586) .................................4,965
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1594) ................................................................................................56,682
From Water and Wastewater Loan Revolving Fund (1602) .............................................10,498
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ..................................................................................25,723
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) ........................................................................329
From Water and Wastewater Loan Fund (1649) ...................................................................165
From Environmental Radiation Monitoring Fund (1656) .....................................................250
From Groundwater Protection Fund (1660) .......................................................................3,165
From Energy Set-Aside Program Fund (1667) ...................................................................2,204
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ................................................................................59,688
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) ...........................................................................14,726
From Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund (1697) ................................................................165
From Oil and Gas Remedial Fund (1699) .............................................................................650
From Storm Water Loan Revolving Fund (1754) ..................................................................200
From Rural Water and Sewer Loan Revolving Fund (1755) .................................................165
From Geologic Resources Fund (1801) ..............................................................................4,400
From Confederate Memorial Park Fund (1812) ....................................................................165
From Concentrated Animal Feeding Operation Indemnity Fund (1834) ..............................450
From Mined Land Reclamation Fund (1906) ...................................................................10,095

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 34
From Doctor Edmund A. Babler Memorial State Park Fund (1911) .....................................417
From Energy Futures Fund (1935) ...................................................................... 4,500
Total ..............................................................................................................................$380,000
Section 6.375. To the Department of Natural Resources
For sales tax on retail sales, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between funds
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ..........................................................................$30,000
From Department of Natural Resources Revolving Services Fund (1425) ......... 1,000
Total ................................................................................................................................$31,000
Section 6.380. To the Department of Natural Resources
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, to the DNR
Cost Allocation Fund for real property leases, related services,
utilities, systems furniture, structural modifications, capital
improvements and related expenses, and for the purpose of
funding the consolidation of Information Technology Services,
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between DNR
Cost Allocation transfer, Cost Allocation HB 13 transfer, and
Cost Allocation Information Technology Services Division
transfer
For Cost Allocation Transfer, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between funds
From Missouri Air Emission Reduction Fund (1267) ..................................................$265,233
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ..........................................................................468,711
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430) ........................................................31,688
From Natural Resources Protection Fund (1555) .............................................................40,517
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ...........................................................................................1,169,042
From Solid Waste Management Fund – Scrap Tire Subaccount (1569) ........................127,924
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) .................................................................613,748
From Metallic Minerals Waste Management Fund (1575) .................................................6,317
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Asbestos Fee
Subaccount (1584) ................................................................................................69,962
From Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance Fund (1585) ...................................................267,296
From Underground Storage Tank Regulation Program Fund (1586) ...............................31,569
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1594) ..............................................................................................865,453
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) .............................................................................4,013,492

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 35
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) .................................................................231,219
From Water and Wastewater Loan Fund (1649) ............................................................232,195
From Environmental Radiation Monitoring Fund (1656) ..................................................9,124
From Groundwater Protection Fund (1660) .....................................................................99,049
From Energy Set-Aside Program Fund (1667) ...............................................................245,436
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ..............................................................................545,806
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) .........................................................................670,950
From Geologic Resources Fund (1801) ............................................................................18,120
From Mined Land Reclamation Fund (1906) ...................................................................89,901
From Energy Futures Fund (1935) ...................................................................................27,345
From Oil and Gas Resources Fund (1543) .........................................................................9,000
From Multipurpose Water Resource Program Fund (1815) ................................ 10,404
Total DNR Cost Allocation Transfer .........................................................................10,159,501
For Cost Allocation HB 13 Transfer, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between funds
From Missouri Air Emission Reduction Fund (1267) ........................................................6,894
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ..............................................................................8,162
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430) .............................................................552
From Natural Resources Protection Fund (1555) ...............................................................1,052
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ................................................................................................30,356
From Solid Waste Management Fund – Scrap Tire Subaccount (1569) ............................3,325
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) ...................................................................15,635
From Metallic Minerals Waste Management Fund (1575) ......................................................99
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Asbestos Fee
Subaccount (1584) ..................................................................................................1,818
From Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance Fund (1585) .......................................................6,947
From Underground Storage Tank Regulation Program Fund (1586) ....................................820
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1594) ................................................................................................22,493
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ..................................................................................69,883
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) .....................................................................3,621
From Water and Wastewater Loan Fund (1649) ................................................................6,035
From Environmental Radiation Monitoring Fund (1656) .....................................................237
From Groundwater Protection Fund (1660) .......................................................................1,551
From Energy Set-Aside Program Fund (1667) ...................................................................4,413
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ................................................................................13,919
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) ...........................................................................17,438

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 36
From Geologic Resources Fund (1801) .................................................................................284
From Mined Land Reclamation Fund (1906) .....................................................................1,408
From Energy Futures Fund (1935) ........................................................................................491
From Oil and Gas Resources Fund (1543) ............................................................................141
From Multipurpose Water Resource Program Fund (1815) ................................ 163
Total Cost Allocation HB 13 Transfer ............................................................................217,737
For Cost Allocation Information Technology Services Division Transfer,
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between funds
From Missouri Air Emission Reduction Fund (1267) ....................................................192,544
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) ..........................................................................234,218
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430) ........................................................15,835
From Natural Resources Protection Fund (1555) .............................................................29,412
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ..............................................................................................851,225
From Solid Waste Management Fund – Scrap Tire Subaccount (1569) ..........................92,866
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570) .................................................................476,782
From Metallic Minerals Waste Management Fund (1575) ...............................................11,028
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Asbestos Fee
Subaccount (1584) ................................................................................................50,788
From Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance Fund (1585) ...................................................195,250
From Underground Storage Tank Regulation Program Fund (1586) ...............................22,917
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Air Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1594) ..............................................................................................628,267
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) .............................................................................2,005,568
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614) .................................................................637,697
From Water and Wastewater Loan Fund (1649) ............................................................168,560
From Environmental Radiation Monitoring Fund (1656) ..................................................6,623
From Energy Set-Aside Program Fund (1667) ...............................................................103,613
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676) ..............................................................................422,504
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679) .........................................................................487,070
From Geologic Resources Fund (1801) ............................................................................31,635
From Energy Futures Fund (1935) ...................................................................................11,544
From Oil and Gas Resources Fund (1543) .......................................................................15,713
100 From Multipurpose Water Resource Program Fund (1815) ................................ 18,163
101 Total Cost Allocation Information Technology Services Division
102 Transfer .................................................................................................... 6,709,822
103 Total .........................................................................................................................$17,087,060

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 37
Section 6.385. To the Department of Natural Resources
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the OA
Information Technology - Federal and Other Fund for the
purpose of funding the consolidation of Information Technology
Services
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ..................................$2,693,271
Section 6.390. To the Department of Natural Resources
For all costs incurred in the operation of the authority, including special
studies
Personal Service ................................................................................................$669,567
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 601,196
From State Environmental Improvement Authority Fund (1654) (Not to
exceed 8.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................................$1,270,763
Section 6.395. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Board of Trustees for the Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance
Fund
For the general administration and operation of the fund, provided five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment
Personal Service ................................................................................................$329,086
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,095,602
From Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance Fund (1585) ................................................2,424,688
For investigating and paying claims obligations of the Petroleum Storage
Tank Insurance Fund
From Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance Fund (1585) ..............................................20,000,000
For refunds of erroneously collected receipts
From Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance Fund (1585) ........................................ 80,000
Total (Not to exceed 4.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$22,504,688
Section 6.400. To the Department of Natural Resources
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Legal Expense Fund for payment of claims, premiums, and
expense as provided by Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 38
Section 6.600. To the Department of Conservation
For Habitat Management, provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 6.600, 6.605, 6.610, 6.615, 6.620, and 6.625
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$28,100,789
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 25,676,463
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) (Not to exceed 525.16
F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................................$53,777,252
Section 6.605. To the Department of Conservation
For Fish and Wildlife Management, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 6.600, 6.605, 6.610, 6.615, 6.620, and 6.625
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$34,464,011
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 16,954,253
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) (Not to exceed 542.84
F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................................$51,418,264
Section 6.610. To the Department of Conservation
For Recreation Management, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 6.600, 6.605, 6.610, 6.615, 6.620, and 6.625
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$14,291,562
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 12,995,846
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) (Not to exceed 238.62
F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................................$27,287,408
Section 6.615. To the Department of Conservation
For Education and Communication, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 6.600, 6.605, 6.610, 6.615, 6.620, and 6.625
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$13,196,863
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 11,395,057
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) (Not to exceed 222.11
F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................................$24,591,920

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 39
Section 6.620. To the Department of Conservation
For Conservation Business Services, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 6.600, 6.605, 6.610, 6.615, 6.620, and 6.625
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$16,600,347
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 47,672,965
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) (Not to exceed 225.68
F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................................$64,273,312
Section 6.625. To the Department of Conservation
For Staff Development and Benefits, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, and twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 6.600, 6.605, 6.610, 6.615, 6.620, and 6.625
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$25,713,370
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,476,114
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) (Not to exceed 37.40
F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................................$30,189,484
Section 6.629. To the Department of Conservation
For vehicle checkpoints where motorists may be detained without
individualized reasonable suspicion and related administrative
expenses
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) .......................................................................$1
PART 2
Section 6.2030. To the Department of Conservation
In reference to all sections, except Section 6.629, in Part 1 of this
act:
No funds shall be expended for vehicle checkpoints where
motorists may be detained without individualized reasonable
suspicion, and related administrative expenses.

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2006 40
Department of Agriculture Totals
General Revenue Fund (121.32 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$13,984,905
Federal Funds (50.76 F.T.E.) .....................................................................................12,677,920
Other Funds (315.68 F.T.E.) ................................................................................ 32,716,201
Total (487.76 F.T.E.) ...............................................................................................$59,379,026
Department of Natural Resources Totals
General Revenue Fund (194.43 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$61,600,127
Federal Funds (305.76 F.T.E.) .................................................................................200,543,450
Other Funds (1,238.46 F.T.E.) ............................................................................. 1,230,561,391
Total (1,738.65 F.T.E.) .......................................................................................$1,492,704,968
Department of Conservation Totals
General Revenue Fund .............................................................................................................$0
Federal Funds .............................................................................................................................0
Other Funds (1,791.81 F.T.E.) ............................................................................. 251,537,641
Total (1,791.81 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................$251,537,641
